Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2458
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Prescription Drug Safety Act, the definitions found in sections 71-2459 to 71-2476 apply.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1052, § 13.